Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7008
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2022, LB1261, § 8.